test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-niska_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - niska - ok : # -m animate noun, Canada goose
     niska+N+AN+Sg: niska
     niska+N+AN+Pl: niskak
     niska+N+AN+Loc: niskinâhk
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: niskasis # also niskisis
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: niskasisak # also niskisisak
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: niskasisinâhk

     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: niniskim
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiniskim
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: oniskima
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg+Obv: oniskimiyiwa
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: niniskiminân
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiniskiminaw
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiniskimiwâw
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: oniskimiwâwa
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl+Obv: oniskimiyiwa

     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: niniskimak
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiniskimak
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: oniskima
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg+Obv: oniskimiyiwa
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: niniskiminânak
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiniskiminawak
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiniskimiwâwak
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: oniskimiwâwa
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl+Obv: oniskimiyiwa

     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: niniskisisim
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiniskisisim
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: oniskisisima
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg+Obv: oniskisisimiyiwa
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: niniskisisiminân
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiniskisisiminaw
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiniskisisimiwâw
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: oniskisisimiwâwa
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl+Obv: oniskisisimiyiwa
 
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: niniskisisimak
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiniskisisimak
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: oniskisisima
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg+Obv: oniskisisimiyiwa
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: niniskisisiminânak
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiniskisisiminawak
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiniskisisimiwâwak
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: oniskisisimiwâwa
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl+Obv: oniskisisimiyiwa
     
     niska+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: niniskiminâhk # niniskahk ?
     niska+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kiniskiminâhk # kiniskahk ?
     niska+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: oniskiminâhk # oniskahk ?
     niska+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: oniskimiyînâhk 
     niska+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: niniskiminâhk
     niska+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kiniskiminâhk
     niska+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kiniskimiwâhk
     niska+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: oniskimiwâhk 
     niska+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: oniskimiyihk

     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: niniskisisiminâhk
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kiniskisisiminâhk
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: oniskisisiminâhk
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: oniskisisimiyînâhk
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: niniskisisiminâninâhk
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kiniskisisiminânâhk
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kiniskisisimiwânâhk
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: oniskisisimiwânâhk
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: oniskisisimiyînâhk
